Utah statutes.
36-27-102.   Legislative counsel to United States Senators.

(1)  The Legislature may provide counsel to United States senators representing Utah.

(2)  The Legislature may request that United States senators representing Utah provide a single response or periodic reports to the Legislature on:

(a)  each senator's progress with or response to the counsel given under Subsection (1); or

(b)  other issues as determined by the Legislature.

